Wisconsin, session 2025, SB89.
do enact as follows:Joint Legislative Council prefatory note: This bill was prepared for the Joint Legislative Council’s Special Committee on State-Tribal Relations.Under current law, the State Superintendent of Public Instruction must conduct a statewide, biennial assessment of the need for American Indian language and culture education programs. Various information must be included in this assessment, including information on the numbers, ages, location, and tribal affiliation of American Indian pupils. While certain school districts began voluntarily reporting tribal affiliation data to the Department of Public Instruction (DPI) during the 2021-2022 academic school year, current law does not explicitly require school districts to collect this information and report it to DPI.Current law also requires each school district to submit an annual school district report to DPI. This report must include various information related to the school district, including the number of children taught in the schools of the school district, the number of hours of direct pupil instruction provided in each school of the school district, and the names of all teachers employed by the school district during the school year. The bill expands the requirements of this report, requiring each school district to report the numbers, ages, and tribal affiliation of American Indian children attending the schools of the school district. The requirement that a school district report information relating to American Indian children attending the schools of the school district does not apply until the 2026-2027 school year.SB89,11Section 1. 120.18 (1) (cm) of the statutes is created to read:SB89,2,52120.18 (1) (cm) Beginning with the annual report filed for the 2026-27 school 3year, the numbers, ages, and tribal affiliation of American Indian children 4attending the schools of the school district during the school year. In this 5paragraph, “American Indian” has the meaning given in s. 115.71 (2).SB89,2,66